Maine, session 132, LD1144.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §6281, first ¶, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. S, §10, is
amended to read:
This chapter applies only to the property tax year years beginning on or after April 1,
2023 2026.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §6281, sub-§1, ¶D, as amended by PL 2023, c. 441, Pt. D, §1,
is further amended to read:
D. "Stabilize" means to maintain the property tax billed to an eligible individual for
up to $900,000 of assessed value for the individual's eligible homestead at the amount
billed for up to $900,000 of assessed value for that homestead for the property tax year
preceding the property tax year for which the individual is requesting stabilization.
Sec. 3. 36 MRSA §6281, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 751, §1, is amended to
read:
3. Stabilization for eligible individual. If a municipality determines that an applicant
for stabilization under subsection 2 is an eligible individual and that the individual's
homestead is an eligible homestead, the municipality shall stabilize the property tax on the
individual's homestead billed for the property tax year for which stabilization was
requested. Except as provided in subsection 4, an eligible individual may have the property
tax stabilized on only one eligible homestead in a property tax year.
Sec. 4. 36 MRSA §6281, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2023, c. 441, Pt. D, §2, is
further amended to read:
5. State compensation. A municipality that has stabilized property tax for an eligible
individual under this chapter may recover from the State 100% of the amount by which the
property tax assessed on the homestead of an eligible individual in the usual manner
exceeds the stabilized amount of property tax billed under subsection 3. A municipality
may recover from the State the cost to administer this chapter. A municipality claiming
compensation under this subsection shall submit a claim to the bureau on the annual return
required by section 383. The bureau shall review claims and determine the total amount to
be paid to each municipality. The bureau shall certify and the Treasurer of State shall pay
the amount due to each municipality by January 15th of the year following the year for
which the claim for compensation was submitted or within 60 days of the date the claim
was filed, whichever is later.